02_Morphology/chv/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%<n%>                ! Noun
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%<nom%>              ! Nominative
%<ins%>              ! Instrumental
%>                   ! Morpheme boundary
%{A%}                ! Archiphoneme [a] or [e]
%<gen%>              ! Genitive
%{м%}
%{Ă%}

LEXICON Root

!Nouns ;
Guesser ;

LEXICON CASES

%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;
%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н  # ;
%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PLURAL

            CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PLURAL ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица", "street"
пахча:пахча N ;   ! "сад", "garden"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город", "city"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет", "council"
тӗс:тӗс N ;       ! "вид", "aspect"
патша:патша N ;   ! "царь", "tsar"
куҫ:куҫ N ;       ! "глаз", "eye"
<<<<<<< HEAD
<<<<<<< HEAD
патшалӑх:патшалӑх N ; !"государство", "state"
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ; ! "специалист"

LEXICON SUBST

PLURAL ;

LEXICON DER-N

%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;

LEXICON Guesser
LEXICON Root

Guesser ;


LEXICON Guesser

🂡%<guess%>:🂡 N ;
%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST ;
